.aura/civic_arena.lexc
! Civic Arena Grammar for AuraOS
! Six-slot morphotactic constraint: DIR → ASP → CLASS → SUBJ → VOICE → STEM
! FST is an admission grammar, not a security sandbox.
! Hard blocked: SUBMIT_OFFICIAL, ALLOCATE_FUNDS, BIND_PARTICIPANT

! DIR — Civic lifecycle direction (Root lexicon)
MultiCharacterSymbols
OBSERVE        OBSERVE
DISCOVER       DISCOVER
DELIBERATE     DELIBERATE
MATCH          MATCH
SIMULATE       SIMULATE
COMPARE        COMPARE
REFINE         REFINE
EXPORT         EXPORT
DISSOLVE       DISSOLVE
End

! ASP — Duration/scope (Gate lexicon)
MultiCharacterSymbols
ONCE                ONCE
SESSION             SESSION
SNAPSHOT            SNAPSHOT
CURRENT_IF_VERIFIED CURRENT_IF_VERIFIED
ITERATIVE           ITERATIVE
PILOT               PILOT
End

! CLASS — Effect class (Action lexicon)
MultiCharacterSymbols
READ_PUBLIC_DATA      READ_PUBLIC_DATA
READ_LAW              READ_LAW
READ_POLICY           READ_POLICY
READ_COMMUNITY_INPUT  READ_COMMUNITY_INPUT
AGGREGATE             AGGREGATE
RANK                  RANK
MATCH_RESOURCE        MATCH_RESOURCE
GENERATE_SCENARIO     GENERATE_SCENARIO
REQUEST_CONSENT       REQUEST_CONSENT
WRITE_SESSION         WRITE_SESSION
EXPORT_PACKET         EXPORT_PACKET
End

! SUBJ — Target resource (Target lexicon)
MultiCharacterSymbols
MAP                 MAP
NEIGHBOURHOOD       NEIGHBOURHOOD
SERVICE             SERVICE
ASSET               ASSET
LEGAL_INSTRUMENT    LEGAL_INSTRUMENT
BYLAW               BYLAW
PLANNING_POLICY     PLANNING_POLICY
BUDGET              BUDGET
GRANT               GRANT
COUNCIL_RECORD      COUNCIL_RECORD
PUBLIC_ENGAGEMENT   PUBLIC_ENGAGEMENT
COMMUNITY_NEED      COMMUNITY_NEED
RESOURCE_OFFER      RESOURCE_OFFER
PROPOSAL            PROPOSAL
OBJECTION           OBJECTION
SCENARIO            SCENARIO
CONSENT_ROUND       CONSENT_ROUND
DECISION_PACKET     DECISION_PACKET
End

! VOICE — Authority/execution context (Physics lexicon)
MultiCharacterSymbols
HUMAN_REQUESTED       HUMAN_REQUESTED
COMMUNITY_CONTRIBUTED COMMUNITY_CONTRIBUTED
OFFICIAL_SOURCE       OFFICIAL_SOURCE
AURA_EXTRACTED        AURA_EXTRACTED
AURA_PROPOSED         AURA_PROPOSED
FACILITATOR_APPROVED  FACILITATOR_APPROVED
GOVERNANCE_APPROVED   GOVERNANCE_APPROVED
SIMULATION_ONLY       SIMULATION_ONLY
End

! STEM — Terminal operation (Terminal lexicon)
MultiCharacterSymbols
QUERY             QUERY
VERIFY            VERIFY
MAP_OP            MAP_OP
SUMMARIZE         SUMMARIZE
CLUSTER           CLUSTER
DECOMPOSE         DECOMPOSE
MATCH_OP          MATCH_OP
RANK_OP           RANK_OP
COMPARE_OP        COMPARE_OP
PROPOSE_BRIDGE    PROPOSE_BRIDGE
COLLECT_RESPONSE  COLLECT_RESPONSE
ASSESS_CONVERGENCE ASSESS_CONVERGENCE
EXPORT_OP         EXPORT_OP
DISSOLVE_OP       DISSOLVE_OP
End

LEXICON Root
OBSERVE:               Gate ;
DISCOVER:              Gate ;
DELIBERATE:            Gate ;
MATCH:                 Gate ;
SIMULATE:              Gate ;
COMPARE:               Gate ;
REFINE:                Gate ;
EXPORT:                Gate ;
DISSOLVE:              Gate ;

LEXICON Gate
ONCE:                  Action ;
SESSION:               Action ;
SNAPSHOT:              Action ;
CURRENT_IF_VERIFIED:   Action ;
ITERATIVE:             Action ;
PILOT:                 Action ;

LEXICON Action
READ_PUBLIC_DATA:      Target ;
READ_LAW:              Target ;
READ_POLICY:           Target ;
READ_COMMUNITY_INPUT:  Target ;
AGGREGATE:             Target ;
RANK:                  Target ;
MATCH_RESOURCE:        Target ;
GENERATE_SCENARIO:     Target ;
REQUEST_CONSENT:       Target ;
WRITE_SESSION:         Target ;
EXPORT_PACKET:         Target ;

LEXICON Target
MAP:                   Physics ;
NEIGHBOURHOOD:         Physics ;
SERVICE:               Physics ;
ASSET:                 Physics ;
LEGAL_INSTRUMENT:      Physics ;
BYLAW:                 Physics ;
PLANNING_POLICY:       Physics ;
BUDGET:                Physics ;
GRANT:                 Physics ;
COUNCIL_RECORD:        Physics ;
PUBLIC_ENGAGEMENT:     Physics ;
COMMUNITY_NEED:        Physics ;
RESOURCE_OFFER:        Physics ;
PROPOSAL:              Physics ;
OBJECTION:             Physics ;
SCENARIO:              Physics ;
CONSENT_ROUND:         Physics ;
DECISION_PACKET:       Physics ;

LEXICON Physics
HUMAN_REQUESTED:       Terminal ;
COMMUNITY_CONTRIBUTED: Terminal ;
OFFICIAL_SOURCE:       Terminal ;
AURA_EXTRACTED:        Terminal ;
AURA_PROPOSED:         Terminal ;
FACILITATOR_APPROVED:  Terminal ;
GOVERNANCE_APPROVED:   Terminal ;
SIMULATION_ONLY:       Terminal ;

LEXICON Terminal
QUERY:             # ;
VERIFY:            # ;
MAP_OP:            # ;
SUMMARIZE:         # ;
CLUSTER:           # ;
DECOMPOSE:         # ;
MATCH_OP:          # ;
RANK_OP:           # ;
COMPARE_OP:        # ;
PROPOSE_BRIDGE:    # ;
COLLECT_RESPONSE:  # ;
ASSESS_CONVERGENCE: # ;
EXPORT_OP:         # ;
DISSOLVE_OP:       # ;
